Illinois, session 104th, SB2159.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Finance Authority Act is amended 5by changing Sections 830-30 and 830-35 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3501/830-30)7    Sec. 830-30. State Guarantees for existing debt. 8    (a) The Authority is authorized to issue State Guarantees 9for farmers' existing debts held by a lender. For the purposes 10of this Section, a farmer shall be a resident of Illinois, who 11is a principal operator of a farm or land, at least 50% of 12whose annual gross income is derived from farming and whose 13debt to asset ratio shall not be less than 40%, except in those 14cases where the applicant has previously used the guarantee 15program there shall be no debt to asset ratio or income 16restriction. For the purposes of this Section, debt to asset 17ratio shall mean the current outstanding liabilities of the 18farmer divided by the current outstanding assets of the 19farmer. The Authority shall establish the maximum permissible 20debt to asset ratio based on criteria established by the 21Authority. Lenders shall apply for the State Guarantees on 22forms provided by the Authority and certify that the 23application and any other documents submitted are true and   SB2159- 2 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1correct. The lender or borrower, or both in combination, shall 2pay an administrative fee as determined by the Authority. The 3applicant shall be responsible for paying any fees or charges 4involved in recording mortgages, releases, financing 5statements, insurance for secondary market issues and any 6other similar fees or charges as the Authority may require. 7The application shall at a minimum contain the farmer's name, 8address, present credit and financial information, including 9cash flow statements, financial statements, balance sheets, 10and any other information pertinent to the application, and 11the collateral to be used to secure the State Guarantee. In 12addition, the lender must agree to bring the farmer's debt to a 13current status at the time the State Guarantee is provided and 14must also agree to charge a fixed or adjustable interest rate 15which the Authority determines to be below the market rate of 16interest generally available to the borrower. If both the 17lender and applicant agree, the interest rate on the State 18Guarantee Loan can be converted to a fixed interest rate at any 19time during the term of the loan. Any State Guarantees 20provided under this Section (i) shall not exceed $500,000 per 21farmer, (ii) shall be set up on a payment schedule not to 22exceed 30 years, and shall be no longer than 30 years in 23duration, and (iii) shall be subject to an annual review and 24renewal by the lender and the Authority; provided that only 25one such State Guarantee shall be outstanding per farmer at 26any one time. No State Guarantee shall be revoked by the   SB2159- 3 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1Authority without a 90-day notice, in writing, to all parties. 2In those cases where the borrower has not previously used the 3guarantee program, the lender shall not call due any loan 4during the first 3 years for any reason except for lack of 5performance or insufficient collateral. The lender can review 6and withdraw or continue with the State Guarantee on an annual 7basis after the first 3 years of the loan, provided a 90-day 8notice, in writing, to all parties has been given.9    (b) The Authority shall provide or renew a State Guarantee 10to a lender if:11        (i) A fee equal to 25 basis points on the loan is paid 12    to the Authority on an annual basis by the lender.13        (ii) The application provides collateral acceptable to 14    the Authority that is at least equal to the State's 15    portion of the Guarantee to be provided.16        (iii) The lender assumes all responsibility and costs 17    for pursuing legal action on collecting any loan that is 18    delinquent or in default.19        (iv) The lender is responsible for the first 15% of 20    the outstanding principal of the note for which the State 21    Guarantee has been applied.22    (c) There is hereby created outside of the State treasury 23a special fund to be known as the Illinois Agricultural Loan 24Guarantee Fund. The State Treasurer shall be custodian of this 25Fund. Any amounts in the Illinois Agricultural Loan Guarantee 26Fund not currently needed to meet the obligations of the Fund   SB2159- 4 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1shall be invested as provided by law, or used by the Authority 2to make direct loans or originate or purchase loan 3participations under subsection (i) or (r) of Section 801-40, 4or used by the Authority, acting jointly with an appropriate 5administrative agency of the State using appropriations or 6other available funds with the Governor's approval, for the 7purposes set out in Sections 850-5, 850-10, or 850-15 of this 8Act. All interest earned from these investments shall be 9deposited into the Fund until the Fund reaches the maximum 10amount authorized in this Act; thereafter, interest earned 11shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund. After 12September 1, 1989, annual investment earnings equal to 1.5% of 13the Fund shall remain in the Fund to be used for the purposes 14established in Section 830-40 of this Act. All earnings on 15direct loans, or loan participations made by the Authority 16under subsection (i) or (r) of Section 801-40, or derived from 17the opportunities set out in Sections 850-5, 850-10, or 850-15 18of this Act with amounts in this Fund shall become funds of the 19Authority. The Authority is authorized to transfer to the Fund 20such amounts as are necessary to satisfy claims during the 21duration of the State Guarantee program to secure State 22Guarantees issued under this Section, provided that amounts to 23be paid from the Industrial Project Insurance Fund created 24under Article 805 of this Act may be paid by the Authority 25directly to satisfy claims and need not be deposited first 26into the Illinois Agricultural Loan Guarantee Fund. If for any   SB2159- 5 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1reason the General Assembly fails to make an appropriation 2sufficient to meet these obligations, this Act shall 3constitute an irrevocable and continuing appropriation of an 4amount necessary to secure guarantees as defaults occur and 5the irrevocable and continuing authority for, and direction 6to, the State Treasurer and the Comptroller to make the 7necessary transfers to the Illinois Agricultural Loan 8Guarantee Fund, as directed by the Governor, out of the 9General Revenue Fund. Within 30 days after November 15, 1985, 10the Authority may transfer up to $7,000,000 from available 11appropriations into the Illinois Agricultural Loan Guarantee 12Fund for the purposes of this Act. Thereafter, the Authority 13may transfer additional amounts into the Illinois Agricultural 14Loan Guarantee Fund to secure guarantees for defaults as 15defaults occur. In the event of default by the farmer, the 16lender shall be entitled to, and the Authority shall direct 17payment on, the State Guarantee after 90 days of delinquency. 18All payments by the Authority to satisfy claims against the 19State Guarantee shall be made, in whole or in part, from any of 20the following funds in such order and in such amounts as the 21Authority shall determine: (1) the Industrial Project 22Insurance Fund created under Article 805 of this Act (if the 23Authority exercises its discretion under subsection (j) of 24Section 805-20); (2) the Illinois Agricultural Loan Guarantee 25Fund; or (3) the Illinois Farmer and Agribusiness Loan 26Guarantee Fund. The Illinois Agricultural Loan Guarantee Fund   SB2159- 6 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1shall guarantee receipt of payment of the 85% of the principal 2and interest owed on the State Guarantee Loan by the farmer to 3the guarantee holder, provided that payments by the Authority 4to satisfy claims against the State Guarantee shall be made in 5accordance with the preceding sentence. It shall be the 6responsibility of the lender to proceed with the collecting 7and disposing of collateral on the State Guarantee under this 8Section, Section 830-35, Section 830-45, Section 830-50, 9Section 830-55, or Article 835 within 14 months of the time the 10State Guarantee is declared delinquent; provided, however, 11that the lender shall not collect or dispose of collateral on 12the State Guarantee without the express written prior approval 13of the Authority. If the lender does not dispose of the 14collateral within 14 months, the lender shall be liable to 15repay to the State interest on the State Guarantee equal to the 16same rate which the lender charges on the State Guarantee; 17provided, however, that the Authority may extend the 14-month 18period for a lender in the case of bankruptcy or extenuating 19circumstances. The Fund from which a payment is made shall be 20reimbursed for any amounts paid from that Fund under this 21Section, Section 830-35, Section 830-45, Section 830-50, 22Section 830-55, or Article 835 upon liquidation of the 23collateral. The Authority, by resolution of the Board, may 24borrow sums from the Fund and provide for repayment as soon as 25may be practical upon receipt of payments of principal and 26interest by a farmer. Money may be borrowed from the Fund by   SB2159- 7 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1the Authority for the sole purpose of paying certain interest 2costs for farmers associated with selling a loan subject to a 3State Guarantee in a secondary market as may be deemed 4reasonable and necessary by the Authority.5    (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 830-30 6with respect to the farmers and lenders who may obtain State 7Guarantees, the Authority may promulgate rules establishing 8the eligibility of farmers and lenders to participate in the 9State guarantee program and the terms, standards, and 10procedures that will apply, when the Authority finds that 11emergency conditions in Illinois agriculture have created the 12need for State Guarantees pursuant to terms, standards, and 13procedures other than those specified in this Section.14(Source: P.A. 100-919, eff. 8-17-18; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 15    (20 ILCS 3501/830-35)16    Sec. 830-35. State Guarantees for loans to farmers and 17agribusiness; eligibility.18    (a) The Authority is authorized to issue State Guarantees 19to lenders for loans to eligible farmers and agribusinesses 20for purposes set forth in this Section. For purposes of this 21Section, an eligible farmer shall be a resident of Illinois 22(i) who is principal operator of a farm or land, at least 50% 23of whose annual gross income is derived from farming, (ii) 24whose annual total sales of agricultural products, 25commodities, or livestock exceeds $20,000, and (iii) whose net   SB2159- 8 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1worth does not exceed $500,000. An eligible agribusiness shall 2be that as defined in Section 801-10 of this Act. The Authority 3may approve applications by farmers and agribusinesses that 4promote diversification of the farm economy of this State 5through the growth and development of new crops or livestock 6not customarily grown or produced in this State or that 7emphasize a vertical integration of grain or livestock 8produced or raised in this State into a finished agricultural 9product for consumption or use. "New crops or livestock not 10customarily grown or produced in this State" shall not include 11corn, soybeans, wheat, swine, or beef or dairy cattle. 12"Vertical integration of grain or livestock produced or raised 13in this State" shall include any new or existing grain or 14livestock grown or produced in this State. Lenders shall apply 15for the State Guarantees on forms provided by the Authority, 16certify that the application and any other documents submitted 17are true and correct, and pay an administrative fee as 18determined by the Authority. The applicant shall be 19responsible for paying any fees or charges involved in 20recording mortgages, releases, financing statements, insurance 21for secondary market issues and any other similar fees or 22charges as the Authority may require. The application shall at 23a minimum contain the farmer's or agribusiness' name, address, 24present credit and financial information, including cash flow 25statements, financial statements, balance sheets, and any 26other information pertinent to the application, and the   SB2159- 9 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1collateral to be used to secure the State Guarantee. In 2addition, the lender must agree to charge an interest rate, 3which may vary, on the loan that the Authority determines to be 4below the market rate of interest generally available to the 5borrower. If both the lender and applicant agree, the interest 6rate on the State Guarantee Loan can be converted to a fixed 7interest rate at any time during the term of the loan. Any 8State Guarantees provided under this Section (i) shall not 9exceed $500,000 per farmer or an amount as determined by the 10Authority on a case-by-case basis for an agribusiness, (ii) 11shall not exceed a term of 15 years, and (iii) shall be subject 12to an annual review and renewal by the lender and the 13Authority; provided that only one such State Guarantee shall 14be made per farmer or agribusiness, except that additional 15State Guarantees may be made for purposes of expansion of 16projects financed in part by a previously issued State 17Guarantee. No State Guarantee shall be revoked by the 18Authority without a 90-day notice, in writing, to all parties. 19The lender shall not call due any loan for any reason except 20for lack of performance, insufficient collateral, or maturity. 21A lender may review and withdraw or continue with a State 22Guarantee on an annual basis after the first 5 years following 23closing of the loan application if the loan contract provides 24for an interest rate that shall not vary. A lender shall not 25withdraw a State Guarantee if the loan contract provides for 26an interest rate that may vary, except for reasons set forth   SB2159- 10 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1herein.2    (b) The Authority shall provide or renew a State Guarantee 3to a lender if:4        (i) A fee equal to 25 basis points on the loan is paid 5    to the Authority on an annual basis by the lender.6        (ii) The application provides collateral acceptable to 7    the Authority that is at least equal to the State's 8    portion of the Guarantee to be provided.9        (iii) The lender assumes all responsibility and costs 10    for pursuing legal action on collecting any loan that is 11    delinquent or in default.12        (iv) The lender is responsible for the first 15% of 13    the outstanding principal of the note for which the State 14    Guarantee has been applied.15    (c) There is hereby created outside of the State treasury 16a special fund to be known as the Illinois Farmer and 17Agribusiness Loan Guarantee Fund. The State Treasurer shall be 18custodian of this Fund. Any amounts in the Fund not currently 19needed to meet the obligations of the Fund shall be invested as 20provided by law, or used by the Authority to make direct loans 21or originate or purchase loan participations under subsection 22(i) or (r) of Section 801-40, or used by the Authority, acting 23jointly with an appropriate administrative agency of the State 24using appropriations or other available funds with the 25Governor's approval, for the purposes set out in Sections 26850-5, 850-10, or 850-15 of this Act. All interest earned from   SB2159- 11 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1these investments shall be deposited into the Fund until the 2Fund reaches the maximum amounts authorized in this Act; 3thereafter, interest earned shall be deposited into the 4General Revenue Fund. After September 1, 1989, annual 5investment earnings equal to 1.5% of the Fund shall remain in 6the Fund to be used for the purposes established in Section 7830-40 of this Act. All earnings on direct loans, or loan 8participations made by the Authority under subsection (i) or 9(r) of Section 801-40, or derived from the opportunities set 10out in Sections 850-5, 850-10, or 850-15 of this Act with 11amounts in this Fund shall become funds of the Authority. The 12Authority is authorized to transfer such amounts as are 13necessary to satisfy claims from available appropriations and 14from fund balances of the Farm Emergency Assistance Fund as of 15June 30 of each year to the Illinois Farmer and Agribusiness 16Loan Guarantee Fund to secure State Guarantees issued under 17this Section, Sections 830-30, 830-45, 830-50, and 830-55, and 18Article 835 of this Act. Amounts to be paid from the Industrial 19Project Insurance Fund created under Article 805 of this Act 20may be paid by the Authority directly to satisfy claims and 21need not be deposited first into the Illinois Farmer and 22Agribusiness Loan Guarantee Fund. If for any reason the 23General Assembly fails to make an appropriation sufficient to 24meet these obligations, this Act shall constitute an 25irrevocable and continuing appropriation of an amount 26necessary to secure guarantees as defaults occur and the   SB2159- 12 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1irrevocable and continuing authority for, and direction to, 2the State Treasurer and the Comptroller to make the necessary 3transfers to the Illinois Farmer and Agribusiness Loan 4Guarantee Fund, as directed by the Governor, out of the 5General Revenue Fund. In the event of default by the borrower 6on State Guarantee Loans under this Section, Section 830-45, 7Section 830-50, or Section 830-55, the lender shall be 8entitled to, and the Authority shall direct payment on, the 9State Guarantee after 90 days of delinquency. All payments by 10the Authority to satisfy claims against the State Guarantee 11shall be made, in whole or in part, from any of the following 12funds in such order and in such amounts as the Authority shall 13determine: (1) the Industrial Project Insurance Fund created 14under Article 805 of this Act (if the Authority exercises its 15discretion under subsection (j) of Section 805-20); (2) the 16Illinois Farmer and Agribusiness Loan Guarantee Fund; or (3) 17the Illinois Farmer and Agribusiness Loan Guarantee Fund. It 18shall be the responsibility of the lender to proceed with the 19collecting and disposing of collateral on the State Guarantee 20under this Section, Section 830-45, Section 830-50, or Section 21830-55 within 14 months of the time the State Guarantee is 22declared delinquent. If the lender does not dispose of the 23collateral within 14 months, the lender shall be liable to 24repay to the State interest on the State Guarantee equal to the 25same rate that the lender charges on the State Guarantee, 26provided that the Authority shall have the authority to extend   SB2159- 13 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1the 14-month period for a lender in the case of bankruptcy or 2extenuating circumstances. The Fund shall be reimbursed for 3any amounts paid under this Section, Section 830-30, Section 4830-45, Section 830-50, Section 830-55, or Article 835 upon 5liquidation of the collateral. The Authority, by resolution of 6the Board, may borrow sums from the Fund and provide for 7repayment as soon as may be practical upon receipt of payments 8of principal and interest by a borrower on State Guarantee 9Loans under this Section, Section 830-30, Section 830-45, 10Section 830-50, Section 830-55, or Article 835. Money may be 11borrowed from the Fund by the Authority for the sole purpose of 12paying certain interest costs for borrowers associated with 13selling a loan subject to a State Guarantee under this 14Section, Section 830-30, Section 830-45, Section 830-50, 15Section 830-55, or Article 835 in a secondary market as may be 16deemed reasonable and necessary by the Authority.17    (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 830-35 18with respect to the farmers, agribusinesses, and lenders who 19may obtain State Guarantees, the Authority may promulgate 20rules establishing the eligibility of farmers, agribusinesses, 21and lenders to participate in the State Guarantee program and 22the terms, standards, and procedures that will apply, when the 23Authority finds that emergency conditions in Illinois 24agriculture have created the need for State Guarantees 25pursuant to terms, standards, and procedures other than those 26specified in this Section.  SB2159- 14 -LRB104 11477 HLH 21566 b1(Source: P.A. 100-919, eff. 8-17-18; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.